Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-207
Aquatic organism, defined.

Aquatic organism means an individual member of any species of fish, mollusk, crustacean, aquatic reptile, aquatic amphibian, aquatic insect, or other aquatic invertebrate. Aquatic organism includes the viable gametes, eggs or sperm, of an aquatic organism.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 17.